Hawaii statutes.
§354D-3 Correctional industries
program. There is established a correctional industries program within the
department. The administrator of the correctional industries program shall be
appointed by the director without regard to chapter 76. The director may
appoint other employees necessary to carry out the function of this chapter
without regard to chapter 76; provided that the number of temporary exempt
positions covered under this section shall not exceed sixty-five in any fiscal
year. [L 1990, c 341, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 170, §6; am L 1997, c 175, §1; am
L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2008, c 65, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next